test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-inemine16_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - inemine: # Noun (16) inemine 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     inemine+N+Sg+Nom: inemine
     inemine+N+Sg+Gen: inemise
     inemine+N+Sg+Par: inemist
     inemine+N+Sg+Ill: inemiste
     inemine+N+Sg+Ine: [inemisen, inemiseh, inemisehn]
     inemine+N+Sg+Ela: inemisest
     inemine+N+Sg+All: inemisele
     inemine+N+Sg+Ade: inemisel
     inemine+N+Sg+Abl: inemiselt
     inemine+N+Sg+Tra: inemises
     inemine+N+Sg+Ter: inemiseniq
     inemine+N+Sg+Abe: inemiseldäq
     inemine+N+Sg+Com: inemisegäq
     inemine+N+Pl+Nom: inemiseq
     inemine+N+Pl+Gen: [inemiisi, inemiste]
     inemine+N+Pl+Par: inemiisi
     inemine+N+Pl+Ill: [inemiisihe, inemiisi, inemiiside]
     inemine+N+Pl+Ine: [inemiisin, inemiisih, inemiisihn, inemisten, inemisteh, inemistehn]
     inemine+N+Pl+Ela: [inemiisist, inemistest]
     inemine+N+Pl+All: [inemiisile, inemistele]
     inemine+N+Pl+Ade: [inemiisil, inemistel]
     inemine+N+Pl+Abl: [inemiisilt, inemistelt]
     inemine+N+Pl+Tra: [inemiisis, inemistes]
     inemine+N+Pl+Ter: [inemiisiniq, inemisteniq]
     inemine+N+Pl+Abe: [inemiisildäq, inemisteldäq]
     inemine+N+Pl+Com: [inemiisigaq, inemistegaq]
